Utah statutes.
30-3-16.1.   Jurisdiction of family court division -- Powers.

Whenever any controversy exists between spouses which may, unless a reconciliation is achieved, result in the dissolution or annulment of the marriage or in the disruption of the household, and there is a child of the spouses or either of them under the age of 17 years whose welfare might be affected, the family court division of the district court shall have jurisdiction over the controversy, over the parties and over all persons having any relation to the controversy and may compel attendance before the court or a domestic relations counselor of the parties or other persons related to the controversy.  The court may make orders in divorce or conciliation proceeding as it deems necessary for the protection of the family interests.



Enacted by Chapter 72, 1969 General Session

